Alaska statutes. Title 30. Navigation, Harbors, Shipping, and Transportation Facilities.
Article 4. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 30.17.300.
Audit.

The legislative auditor shall audit or shall cause to have audited annually the financial records of the authority. The legislative auditor may prescribe the form and content of the financial records of the authority and shall have access to these records at reasonable times.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.310.
Equal use and access.

If the authority owns, leases, or otherwise operates or controls, or participates in the financing of, a facility, the authority shall, to the maximum extent possible, provide for equal rights of access to and use of the facility by members of the public and other persons or entities upon terms and conditions that are fair and reasonable. However, this section does not prevent the authority from establishing fair and reasonable limitations on use of or access to a facility to the extent the limitations are necessary in connection with the nature of the facility or the demand for use of or access to the facility. This section applies to the establishment of rates and rate structures as well as all other factors, terms, and conditions relating to the use of or access to the facility, including without limitation the design and location of the facility. The members of the authority shall make a written finding concerning compliance of the facility with this section. A written finding signed by a majority of the authority members complies with the provisions of this section and shall constitute a conclusive presumption of compliance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.320.
Succession.

The authority is dissolved one year after the date of incorporation of a municipality, other than a second class city, that has an area coterminous with or inclusive of the area formerly encompassed by the Adak Naval Air Facility. Upon dissolution of the authority, the municipality succeeds to the assets and liabilities of the authority and succeeds to the rights, powers, and duties of the authority under contracts to which the authority is a party on the date of dissolution. Except for this section, this chapter is not applicable to a municipality that succeeds the authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.330.
Purchase of project and leases.

This chapter does not prevent the inclusion in a lease or other agreement relating to a project of a provision granting the right to purchase the project, or to renew or extend the lease or agreement, upon the terms and conditions that may be provided for in the lease or agreement.

A lease with respect to a project may provide for two or more lessees with the legal relationship between themselves and the authority that the authority may approve, including provisions to the effect that the obligations of the lessees under the lease for payment of rental or otherwise between themselves and the authority are several, joint, or joint and several and that the lessees lease the project as tenants-in-common, or otherwise.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.340.
Conflicts of interest.

A member of the authority may not vote on a matter relating to a lease or contract entered into or to be entered into by the authority under this chapter if the member is a party to the lease or contract or has a direct ownership or equity interest in a firm, partnership, corporation, or association that may be a party to the contract or lease. A matter relating to a lease or contract that is approved by a majority of the members who are not barred from voting under this section is a valid action of the authority for all purposes.

Members of the authority are subject to AS 39.52 (Alaska Executive Branch Ethics Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.350.
Operation of certain statutes excepted.

The authority may not be considered to be or constitute (1) a political subdivision of the state as the term is used in AS

37.10.085

, (2) a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state as the terms are used in AS 29, or (3) except as provided in AS

30.17.360

, a state agency as the term is used in AS 37, but for all other purposes the authority constitutes a political subdivision and an instrumentality of the state as provided in this chapter.

The funds, income, or receipts of the authority may not be considered to be or constitute money of the state, nor may real property in which the authority has an interest be considered land owned in fee by the state or to which the state may become entitled or in any way land belonging to the state, or state land referred to in art. VIII, Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.360.
Compliance with Executive Budget Act; finances.

The operating budget of the authority is subject to AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act).

To further ensure effective budgetary decision making by the legislature, the authority shall

annually review the authority’s assets to determine whether assets of the authority exceed an amount required to fulfill the purposes of the authority as defined in this chapter; in making its review, the members of the authority shall determine whether, and to what extent, assets in excess of the amount required to fulfill the purposes of the authority during at least the next fiscal year are available without

breaching an agreement entered into by the authority;

materially impairing the operations or financial integrity of the authority; or

materially affecting the ability of the authority to fulfill the authority’s purposes; and

present to the legislature by January 10 of each year a complete accounting of all assets of the authority and a report of the review and determination made under (1) of this subsection; the accounting shall be audited by the auditor who conducts the audit required by AS

30.17.300

, including income earned on assets of the authority during that period.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.370.
Reports and publications.

By January 10 of each year, the authority shall publish a report for distribution to the governor, legislature, and the public. The authority shall notify the legislature that the report is available. The report shall be written in easily understandable language. The report must include a financial statement audited by an independent outside auditor, a statement of the authority’s investments under this chapter, including an appraisal of the investments at market value, a comparison of the authority’s performance with the goals of the authority, and other information the members of the authority believe would be of interest to the governor, the legislature, and the public. The annual income statement and balance sheet of the authority shall be published in at least one newspaper circulating in each judicial district. The authority may also publish other reports it considers desirable to carry out its purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)